Missouri, session 2026, HB2166.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 56.265, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 56.265, to read as follows:
56.265. 1. The county prosecuting attorney in any county, other than in a chartered
county, shall receive an annual salary computed using the following schedule, when
applicable. The assessed valuation factor shall be the amount thereof as shown for the year
immediately preceding the year for which the computation is done.
(1) For a full-time prosecutor the prosecutor shall receive compensation equal to the
compensation of an associate circuit judge;
(2) For a part-time prosecutor:
Assessed Valuation Amount
$18,000,000 to 40,999,999 $37,000
41,000,000 to 53,999,999 38,000
54,000,000 to 65,999,999 39,000
66,000,000 to 85,999,999 41,000
86,000,000 to 99,999,999 43,000
100,000,000 to 130,999,999 45,000
131,000,000 to 159,999,999 47,000
160,000,000 to 189,999,999 49,000
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2166 2
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 51,000
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 53,000
300,000,000 or more 55,000
2. Two thousand dollars of the salary shall be payable to any prosecuting attorney
only if the prosecuting attorney has completed at least twenty hours of classroom instruction
each calendar year relating to the operations of the prosecuting attorney's office when
approved by a professional association of the county prosecuting attorneys of Missouri unless
exempted from the training by the professional association. The professional association
approving the program shall provide a certificate of completion to each prosecuting attorney
who completes the training program and shall send a list of certified prosecuting attorneys to
the treasurer of each county or city not within a county. Expenses incurred for attending the
training session may be reimbursed to the prosecuting attorney in the same manner as other
expenses as may be appropriated for that purpose.
3. Each calendar year, five thousand dollars of the salary shall be payable to any
prosecuting attorney only if the prosecuting attorney has collected the data described in
subsection 2 of section 56.750 in a manner approved by the prosecutors coordinators training
council and makes the data described in subsection 2 of section 56.750 readily accessible to
the Missouri office of prosecution services. The Missouri office of prosecution services shall
provide a certificate of compliance to each prosecuting attorney who complies with this
subsection and shall send a list of any certified prosecuting attorney to the respective treasurer
of each county or city not within a county.
4. For each calendar year, three thousand dollars of the salary shall be payable to any
prosecuting attorney only if the prosecuting attorney has provided discovery to criminal
defense attorneys who have entered an appearance on behalf of a defendant in a manner
approved by the prosecutors coordinators training council. The Missouri office of
prosecution services shall provide a certificate of compliance to each prosecuting attorney
who complies with this subsection and shall send a list of any certified prosecuting attorney to
the respective treasurer of each county or city not within a county.
5. As used in this section, the term "prosecuting attorney" includes the circuit attorney
of any city not within a county.
6. The prosecuting attorney of any county which becomes a county of the first
classification during a four-year term of office or a county which passed the proposition
authorized by subsection 1 of section 56.363 shall not be required to devote full time to such
office pursuant to section 56.067 until the beginning of the prosecuting attorney's next term of
office or until the proposition otherwise becomes effective.

HB 2166 3
7. The provisions of section 56.066 shall not apply to full-time prosecutors who are
compensated pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this section.
8. The state shall reimburse, through an appropriation, at least thirty percent of
the salary of the prosecuting attorney in each county of the third classification as
computed under this section.
✔